Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8027.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-15-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-15 entitled "Actions by
and Against Towns" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-15-5. Presentment to council of claim or demand against town.
(a) Every person who has any money due him or her from any town or city, or any claim
or demand against any town or city, for any matter, cause, or thing whatsoever, shall take the
following method to obtain what is due: The person shall present to the town council of the town,
or to the city council of the city, a particular account of that person’s claim, debt, damages, or
demand, and how incurred or contracted; which being done, in case just and due satisfaction is not
made to him or her by the town or city treasurer of the town or city within forty (40) days after the
presentment of the claim, debt, damages, or demand, the person may commence his or her action
against the treasurer for the recovery of the complaint.
(b) Within sixty (60) days of the close of their fiscal year, every municipality shall be
required to disclose on their official website the following information:
(1) A list of civil actions filed in state or federal court during the year, or which concluded
during the year, in which the municipality, or any official or employee of the municipality, sued or
was sued in their official capacity;
(2) The case number for each civil action and the court in which it was filed;
(3) A short description of the legal claims asserted in the case;
(4) The current status of the case;

(5) The amount of legal fees incurred and/or paid by the municipality related to the civil
action; and
(6) Upon conclusion of the civil action, a breakdown of all costs and expenses in the
following categories:
(i) Court costs;
(ii) Legal fees;
(iii) Expert witness fees;
(iv) Compensatory and punitive damages; and
(v) Any other costs, fees or expenses incurred.
(c) Nothing contained in subsection (b) of this section shall be construed to affect the
availability of records pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38 ("access to public records").
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005790
========
LC005790 - Page 2 of 3